Utah statutes.
72-9-601.   Tow truck motor carrier requirements -- Authorized towing
certificates.
(1)  In addition to the requirements of this chapter, a tow truck motor
carrier shall:
(a)  ensure that all the motor carrier's tow truck drivers are properly:
(i)  trained to operate tow truck equipment;
(ii)  licensed, as required under Title 53, Chapter 3, Uniform Driver License
Act; and
(iii)  complying with the requirements under Sections 41-6a-1406 and 72-9-603;
and
(b)  obtain and display a current authorized towing certificate for the tow
truck motor carrier, and each tow truck and driver, as required under Section
72-9-602.
(2)  A tow truck motor carrier may only perform a towing service described in
Section 41-6a-1406, 41-6a-1407, or 72-9-603, with a tow truck and driver that
has a current authorized towing certificate under this part.
